Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. School Buses

§ 1281.
Additional equipment.

In addition to other equipment required by this title, any school bus as described in section 4 of this title shall be equipped as follows:

A door in the rear and a door on the right side for entrance or exit purposes.

At least one fire extinguisher of a type approved by the Commissioner at all times in good and usable condition and easily accessible to the driver.

A standard first-aid kit of a type approved by the Commissioner at all times filled with necessary articles.

A hot water heater at all times capable of keeping the interior at a comfortable temperature or other type of heater approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.

Adequate ventilation facilities.

At least two windows of safety glass on each side to provide interior light and so secured as to afford protection against wind and rain.

Seats securely fastened to the floor or sides of the interior and providing at least 13 inches of seat space for each child to be transported.

In addition to the foregoing, all motor vehicles in which the original seating equipment has been modified or added to must comply with the following:

All seats must be readily accessible by use of an aisle or door without interference from any other seat or seats.

A minimum of 36 inches headroom for sitting position above top of undepressed cushion line of all seats shall be provided.

A minimum of 12 inches shall be provided from the top of the undepressed cushion line to the floor.

Seats shall be covered with fire-resistant material.

Jump seats or portable seats shall not be used.

A seat beside the driver, if regular equipment or installed by the vehicle manufacturer, may be used for student seating. It shall be securely fastened to the body and shall be so constructed as not to interfere with students entering or leaving vehicle.

All seats shall have at least 12 inches overall depth.

If forward-facing seats are used, they shall be so placed that the distance from center to center measured at top center of the backs shall be not less than 26 inches.

If longitudinal seats are used, only two shall be installed against the sides of the vehicle and the distance between the front edges of seat cushions shall be at least 24 inches.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 26

, eff. Aug. 1, 1959;

1961, No. 124

, eff. Aug. 1, 1961;

1965, No. 199

;

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1977, No. 102

, § 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

§ 1281a.
Optional equipment.

In addition to equipment required under section 1283 of this title, any school bus as described in subdivision 4(34) of this title may be equipped with a stop arm sign with flashing red lights, of a type approved by the Commissioner, securely mounted below the left front window on the vehicle in an area approved by the Commissioner and must be visible to the driver when extended.
Such sign shall not be activated unless the vehicle has stopped on the highway for the purpose of receiving or discharging public or private schoolchildren. At no time shall the sign be extended when the vehicle is in motion.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 49

, § 1; amended

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1977, No. 102

, § 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

§ 1282.
Operator, equipment, and inspection.

Before an individual may assume the duty of transporting school pupils in either a Type I or Type II school bus, he or she shall as a minimum:

For Type I, have a valid State of Vermont commercial driver license with a passenger endorsement and a school bus driver’s endorsement or, for Type II, have a valid State of Vermont license with a school bus driver’s endorsement or have a license from another jurisdiction valid for the class or type of vehicle to be driven.

Furnish the Department of Motor Vehicles or, in the case of an individual licensed in another jurisdiction, furnish his or her employer a certificate signed by a licensed physician, or a certified physician assistant, or a nurse practitioner in accordance with written protocols, that he or she is, as far as can be determined by reasonable inquiry and examination, mentally and physically competent to perform his or her duties. Any newly diagnosed diabetic or established diabetic must be stabilized and must be certified by his or her personal physician that he or she has not had a hypoglycemic reaction (loss of consciousness or near loss of consciousness) for the last two years or since his or her last physical, whichever is longer. Any diabetic must be recertified every six months by his or her personal physician who must state that the patient has not had a hypoglycemic reaction during that time.

Have completed training in school bus operation, including evacuation and emergency procedures, as the Commissioner deems necessary.

Be licensed for Type I or Type II, or both, Type I being an automatic qualification for a Type II operator.

Furnish to his or her employer, prior to the first date of employment as a school bus driver, a copy of his or her three-year operating record.

A school bus shall not be operated in the transportation of children to and from school unless and until it is inspected at an inspection station designated as such by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The inspection shall thoroughly cover mechanical conditions, standard equipment, extra equipment, and safety and comfort conditions all as provided in section 1281 of this title and, if the inspected vehicle meets all of these requirements, the inspection station shall give the owner or operator of the inspected vehicle a signed certificate so stating. This certificate shall be shown as soon as possible by the owner or operator to a school director in the town in which this vehicle is to be operated and shall thereafter be carried in some easily accessible place in the vehicle. Thereafter, so long as this bus remains in this service, it must be reinspected as provided in this section during each of the following periods: January to April, May to August, and September to December. School buses of the pleasure car type, if regularly used in this service, shall display signs required in subdivision 1283(a)(1) of this title when transporting schoolchildren.

A school bus shall not regularly transport more passengers than seating space of 13 inches for each child will permit.
(c) (1) A school bus shall not regularly transport more passengers than seating space of 13 inches for each child will permit.

Bus routing and seating plans shall be coordinated so as to eliminate standees when a school bus is in motion, and standees shall be permitted only in emergency situations.

There shall be no auxiliary seating accommodations such as temporary or folding jump seats in school buses.

Not less often than every two years, and before the start of a school year, an individual licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles to assume the duty of transporting school pupils in either a Type I or Type II school bus shall furnish the employer who employs him or her as a school bus driver the following:
(d) (1) Not less often than every two years, and before the start of a school year, an individual licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles to assume the duty of transporting school pupils in either a Type I or Type II school bus shall furnish the employer who employs him or her as a school bus driver the following:

a certificate signed by a licensed physician, a certified physician assistant, or a nurse practitioner in accordance with written protocols, certifying that the licensee is, as far as can be determined by reasonable inquiry and examination, mentally and physically competent to perform his or her duties and that he or she meets or exceeds the minimum hearing standards, based on voice testing, as prescribed by the Commissioner; and

a certificate signed by a properly registered and authorized medical doctor, ophthalmologist, optometrist, or nurse practitioner certifying that he or she meets or exceeds the minimum vision standards as prescribed by the Commissioner.

Upon receipt of a certificate required by this subsection that indicates that the school bus driver is not mentally or physically competent or does not meet the minimum hearing or vision standards, the employer shall immediately notify the Commissioner.

The certificates required under this subsection may be valid for up to two years from the examination.

In the event the school bus driver is subject to 49 C.F.R. Part 391, Subpart E, the provisions of those regulations rather than the standards of this section shall apply.

Subject to State Board of Education rules, which may provide for limited idling, the operator of a school bus shall not idle the engine while waiting for children to board or to exit the vehicle at a school and shall not start the engine until ready to leave the school premises. The Board, in consultation with the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Health, and the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. The rules shall set forth periods or circumstances that reasonably require the idling of the engine, including periods when it is necessary to operate defrosting, heating, or cooling equipment to ensure the health or safety of the driver or passengers or to operate auxiliary equipment; and periods when the engine is undergoing maintenance or inspection.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 137

, § 2;

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 7;

1985, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1989, No. 33

, § 1;

1989, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 15, 1990;

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), §
39, eff. June 9, 2004;

2007, No. 48

, § 1, eff. May 25, 2007;

2015, No. 47

, § 29;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 71;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2020.

§ 1283.
Identification and equipment of school buses.

Types I and II school buses shall be:

Identified with the words, “School Bus,” printed in letters not less than eight inches high, located between the warning signal lamps as high as possible without impairing visibility of the lettering from both front and rear.

Painted national school bus glossy yellow, except that the hood shall be either national school bus glossy yellow or lusterless black, the fenders shall be either national school bus glossy yellow or black, and the roof shall be either national school bus glossy yellow or white. For Type II school buses, the requirements of this subdivision and subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall apply to any new bus ordered on or after January 1, 2000.

Equipped with bumpers of glossy black, unless for increased night visibility they are covered with a reflective material, or, if the school bus is a plug-in electric vehicle, blue.

Equipped with a system of signal lamps approved by the Commissioner, including an eight-light system on any new or used school bus ordered on and after July 1, 1976. The driver of a Type I or a Type II school bus shall keep the alternately flashing red signal lamps lighted whenever school children are being received or discharged, and they shall be used only for that purpose. A school bus driver found in violation of this subdivision shall be guilty of a traffic violation.

Equipped with a system of mirrors, if such a system is necessary to give the seated driver a view of the roadway to each side of the bus, and of the area immediately in front of the front bumper, in accordance with the following procedure: when a rod, 30 inches long, is placed upright on the ground at any point along a traverse line one foot forward of the forward most point of a school bus, and extending the width of the bus, at least seven inches of the length of the rod shall be visible to the driver, either by direct view or by means of an indirect visibility system.
(5) (A) Equipped with a system of mirrors, if such a system is necessary to give the seated driver a view of the roadway to each side of the bus, and of the area immediately in front of the front bumper, in accordance with the following procedure: when a rod, 30 inches long, is placed upright on the ground at any point along a traverse line one foot forward of the forward most point of a school bus, and extending the width of the bus, at least seven inches of the length of the rod shall be visible to the driver, either by direct view or by means of an indirect visibility system.

In addition, equipped with an inside mirror so located as to give the driver clear vision of the interior of the bus, and an outside mirror located on each side of the bus located so as to give an unobstructed view of the road to the rear.

In compliance with the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards for school buses as of the date of manufacture.

Any school bus meeting the identification requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) of this section that is permanently converted for use wholly for purposes other than transporting pupils to or from school, or transporting organized groups of preschool or school-age children, shall be painted a color other than national school bus glossy yellow and shall have the stop arm, if any, and equipment required by this section removed.

Type I and Type II school buses being operated on a public highway and transporting primarily passengers other than school pupils shall have the words “School Bus” covered, removed, or otherwise concealed, and the stop arms and equipment permitted by section 1281a of this title shall not be operable through the usual controls.

No motor vehicle other than a school bus shall display the identifying equipment and signs required by this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

1977, No. 102

, § 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1977;

1977, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 3, 1978;

1979, No. 12

, eff. March 19, 1979;

1979, No. 39

, § 2;

1979, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 32

, § 4;

2015, No. 47

, § 30;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 1284.
Vehicle maintenance.

School buses shall at all times be maintained in a safe operating condition.

A systematic preventive maintenance program shall be established and records kept, which at all times shall be available for inspection by any enforcement officer.

School bus drivers shall perform daily pre-trip inspections of their vehicles and report immediately, in writing, to their supervisors, any defects or deficiencies discovered that may affect the safety of the operation of the vehicle or result in its mechanical breakdown.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 1285.
Pupil instruction.

At least twice during each school year, each pupil who is transported in a school bus shall be instructed by school authorities in safe riding practices, and participate in emergency evacuation drills.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 1286.
Penalties.

Any violation of section 1283, 1284, or 1285 of this title shall be a traffic violation as defined in chapter 24 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1997, No. 32

, § 5.

§ 1287.
Multifunction school activity bus.

A “multifunction school activity bus” is a vehicle that is used to transport students on trips other than on a fixed route between home and school and that meets the construction and safety standards for a “multifunction school activity bus” adopted by rule by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.

If a school owns a multifunction school activity bus or leases one other than as provided in subdivision 4(34)(A)(vi) of this title, the driver shall be required to hold a license that includes a school bus driver’s endorsement. A school bus endorsement road test may be taken in a multifunction school activity bus, but the resulting endorsement shall be restricted to the operation of the appropriately sized multifunction school activity bus. Otherwise, the endorsement shall be a Type I or Type II endorsement as appropriate to the size of the vehicle.

A multifunction school activity bus may be a color other than national school bus yellow.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 29

, § 2; amended

2015, No. 50

, § 9.